Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
WELLS

[§174C-81] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context otherwise requires, the terms:

"Abandoned well" means any well that
has been permanently discontinued. Any well shall be deemed abandoned which is
in such a state of disrepair that continued use for the purpose of obtaining
ground water is impractical.

"Installation of pumps and pumping
equipment" means the procedure employed in the placement and preparation
for operation of pumps and pumping equipment, including all construction
involved in making entrance to the well, and establishing seals and repairs to
existing installations.

"Pump installation contractor" means
any person, firm, or corporation which is in the business of installing or
repairing pumps and pumping equipment.

"Pumps and pumping equipment" means
any equipment or materials utilized or intended for use in withdrawing or
obtaining ground water. It includes seals, tanks, fittings, and controls.

"Repairs" means any change,
replacement, or other alteration of any well, pump, or pumping equipment which
requires a breaking or opening of the well seal.

"Well" shall be as defined in section
174C-3.

"Well construction" means the
producing of any well, including the construction, alteration, or repair
thereof, but excluding the installation of pumps and pumping equipment.

"Well driller" means any person,
firm, or corporation which constructs, alters, or repairs wells.

"Well seal" means an approved
arrangement or device used to cap a well or to establish and maintain a
junction between the casing or curbing of a well and the piping or equipment
installed therein, the purpose or function of which is to prevent pollutants
from entering the well at the other terminal. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next